Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Part 1 Registration by Election Commissions
2-2-118. Filling out of permanent registration record — Change of registration or name.

If a person registers to vote in the election commission office, the commission employee who assists the person in registering shall fill out the permanent registration record except for the person's signature or mark.

When any person changes one's registration from postcard to in-person, the record from the old form may be transferred onto the new form, and the new form may indicate the date of transfer upon request of the registrant.

Except as provided in subsection (d):

When a person changes one's name for any reason on the registration form, the record from the old form may be transferred onto the new form, and the new form may indicate the date of transfer upon request of the registrant; and

If a person changes one's name because of a change in marital status, the person may use either the old name or the new name. If the person wishes to have one's new name reflected on the registration form, the person shall so request the administrator of elections or a designated employee.

In any county having a population of not less than eight hundred twenty-five thousand (825,000) nor more than eight hundred thirty thousand (830,000) according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, when a person changes one's name on one's registration form, the record from the old form may be transferred onto the new form, and the new form may indicate the date of transfer upon request of the registrant.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1975, ch. 308, § 6; T.C.A., § 2-218; Acts 1981, ch. 460, § 1; 1990, ch. 628, § 1; 1993, ch. 518, §§ 20, 21; 1994, ch. 919, § 17.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

2-2-119. Disabled registrant — Inability to write signature or make mark.

If a registrant's disability prevents the registrant from writing a signature or making a mark, the person who assists the registrant shall write the name for the registrant. Such person shall indicate this action by signing such person's name immediately after the space for the registrant's signature or mark.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-219; Acts 1994, ch. 919, § 18.

2-2-120. Determination of registrant's right to register — Declaration as a registered voter.

The administrator of elections shall determine, from the registrant's answers to the questions on the permanent registration record and other questions, if necessary, whether the registrant is entitled to register. If the administrator determines that the registrant is entitled to register, the administrator shall declare the registrant a registered voter.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, no voter shall be purged due to a deficient registration form once the administrator has declared the person a registered voter under subsection (a) unless the administrator later determines the voter knowingly made or consented to false information being placed on the registration form or failed to provide a valid signature.

At least quarterly, during a county election commission meeting, a county election commission member of the majority and the minority party shall inspect random voter registration forms accepted by the county election commission since the previous inspection. If a deficiency is found, the deficiency shall be recorded and a written report shall be prepared including the name of the administrator at the time the voter registration form was filed, the nature of the deficiency, and whether the individual has voted since the deficient form was filed and accepted. Such report shall be filed with the state coordinator of elections. If no deficiencies are identified, the coordinator of elections shall be notified in writing of the finding. The commission members who inspect the voter registration forms shall sign and date the report.

If a significant number of deficient voter registration forms are discovered, then the administrator of elections may be subject to discipline by the state election commission or be terminated by the county election commission.

The coordinator of elections is authorized to develop a policy to implement this subsection (c).

The coordinator of elections shall audit at least ten (10) county election commissions annually to ensure that all required information fields on the permanent registration forms are being completed with minimal errors and that voters with deficient registrations are being given the opportunity to correct incorrect or omitted information.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-220; Acts 2010, ch. 906, § 1; 2011, ch. 181, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

For the Preamble to the act concerning deficient voter registration forms, please refer to Acts 2010, ch. 906.

2-2-121. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §2-2-121 (Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-221), concerning determination of residence and cancellation of registration, was repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 337, § 2. For factors in determining residence, see §2-2-122; for cancellation of registration, see §2-2-123; for rejection of registration, see §2-2-125.

2-2-122. Principles for determination of residence — Factors involved.

The determination of whether a person is a resident or where the person resides or has residence for purposes of the election code shall be made in the light of the following principles:

The residence of a person is that place in which the person's habitation is fixed, and to which, whenever the person is absent, the person has a definite intention to return; provided, that a person may not register to vote using a business location as the registration address when the sole basis for the person's presence at such location is based on a business or commercial use;

A change of residence is generally made only by the act of removal joined with the intent to remain in another place. There can be only one (1) residence;

A person does not become a resident of a place solely by intending to make it the person's residence. There must be appropriate action consistent with the intention;

A person does not lose residence if, with the definite intention of returning, the person leaves home and goes to another country, state or place within this state for temporary purposes, even if of one or more years duration;

The place where a married person's spouse and family have their habitation is presumed to be the person's place of residence, but a married person who takes up or continues abode with the intention of remaining at a place other than where the person's family resides is a resident where the person abides;

A person may be a resident of a place regardless of the nature of the person's habitation, whether house or apartment, mobile home or public institution, owned or rented; however, a commercial address may not be used for residential purposes, unless the applicant provides evidence of such applicant's residential use of such address;

A person does not gain or lose residence solely by reason of the person's presence or absence while employed in the service of the United States or of this state, or while a student at an institution of learning, or while kept in an institution at public expense, or while confined in a public prison or while living on a military reservation; and

No member of the armed forces of the United States, or such member's spouse or dependent, is a resident of this state solely by reason of being stationed in this state.

The following factors, among other relevant matters, may be considered in the determination of where a person is a resident:

The person's possession, acquisition or surrender of inhabitable property;

Location of the person's occupation;

Place of licensing or registration of the person's personal property;

Place of payment of taxes which are governed by residence;

Purpose of the person's presence in a particular place; and

Place of the person's licensing for activities such as driving.

In determining the residency of a person involuntarily confined in a state institution, the mere anticipation of a future grant of living quarters in a specific half-way house shall not be sufficient to establish intent to reside in such half-way house following release from the institution.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter to the contrary, whenever county boundary lines cross through a farm being operated as a single unit, leaving such farm in two (2) separate counties, persons residing on such farms may make a one-time election to register to vote in either county. The administrator of elections shall place a person who chooses to register in the county which adjoins the physical location of the person's residence in the precinct where the property in the adjoining county is located.

For the purpose of this subsection (c), “farm” means a tract of land of at least fifteen (15) acres constituting a farm unit engaged in the production of growing crops, plants, animals, nursery or floral products. Such farm shall produce gross agricultural income averaging at least one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) per year over a three-year period.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter to the contrary, a person shall be eligible to register to vote in the county where the person pays property taxes on the person's primary residence even though the property is partially or totally located in another county, but the only access to the property is through the county where the person pays property taxes. Any person residing at such property shall make a one-time election to register to vote in either the county where the property taxes are paid or the county where the property is located.

The county election commission may require the person to provide written documentation that the person pays property tax in the county if a person chooses to register in the county where the property taxes are paid.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1973, ch. 327, § 3; T.C.A., § 2-222; Acts 1989, ch. 590, § 11; 1994, ch. 859, § 13; 1994, ch. 919, § 19; 2005, ch. 163, §§ 1, 2; 2008, ch. 939, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

Law Reviews.

The Origins and Constitutionality of State Unit Voting in the Electoral College, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 2099 (2001).

2-2-123. Cancellation of previous registration.

If a registrant was previously registered in any other place, the registrant's application to register shall serve as a cancellation of registration for the last place of registration. Upon registration of the voter, the administrator of elections shall mail a copy of the new registration to the county election commission where the voter was last registered or otherwise notify such county election commission of the new registration.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-223; Acts 1994, ch. 919, § 20.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

Cross-References. Notice of cancellation attached to records, §2-2-134.

2-2-124. Registration card.

After determining that the registrant is entitled to register, the administrator of elections shall give or mail to each voter who is registered permanently a registration card which shall certify that the voter is registered. The voter shall sign the card in the presence of the administrator except for mail registrants or transferors.

The card shall be in substantially the following form on material on which any alteration of the card or of the voter's signature will be readily apparent:

REGISTRATION CARDThis is to certify that Mr. Mrs. Missof voting precinct ward City County Tennessee, was duly registered on the day of , 20 . Residence and is entitled to vote on and after . Administrator of Elections Voter's Signature

On the reverse side of the card shall be printed the reasons for which the registration will be purged and how registration may be transferred to prevent purging.

Registered voters determined by the administrator of elections to be blind so as to qualify for assistance in voting as provided by § 2-7-116(b) shall be provided a permanent registration card, on the reverse side of which shall be printed the provisions for assistance available to such voters under § 2-7-116(b).

Under no circumstances shall a social security number be printed on a voter registration card or used as an identifying number on a voter registration card.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1977, ch. 5, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-224; Acts 2001, ch. 413, § 3; 2008, ch. 635, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

Acts 2008, ch. 635, § 2 provided that the act, which added (e), shall apply only to voter registration cards issued or reissued on or after March 18, 2008.

2-2-125. Rejected registration — Right to appeal — Reports of violations.

If the administrator of elections determines that the registrant is not entitled to be registered, the administrator shall tell the registrant the reason, write the reason on the back of the original permanent registration record, and file the original and the duplicate alphabetically in a binder of rejected registrations.

The administrator shall tell the registrant that the registrant has a right to appeal the decision to the commission within ten (10) days and offer the registrant an appeal form.

The action of the commission on the registrant's application for registration on appeal shall be a final administrative action.

If the commission determines, after notice and hearing for the appellant, that the appellant was not entitled to register, the commission shall give the appellant a written statement of its reasons for so holding.

If the commission believes that the appellant has violated the law in registering, it shall report the matter to the grand jury and the district attorney general.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-225.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

2-2-126. Keeping of original and duplicate registration records.

Once the person is registered, the administrator of elections shall file the original permanent registration record alphabetically in the master file of all the registered voters in the county.

The coordinator of elections shall devise a method to be followed for the filing and preservation of postal card registrations and computerized duplicate registration records in any county utilizing a computerized voter registration system.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1975, ch. 308, § 7; T.C.A., § 2-226; Acts 1984, ch. 935, §§ 2, 6; 1989, ch. 590, § 2; 2008, ch. 928, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 6.

2-2-127. Permanent registration records open to inspection — Social security number redaction and use.

Permanent registration records as public records shall be kept in a safe place by the commission, shall be available for public inspection, and may not be removed from the office of the commission except as required for the performance of duties under this title or in compliance with court orders; provided, that a registrar shall make a reasonable effort to redact a person's social security number from a record before such record is made available to any person other than the holder of the number if such record is stored in a computer readable format on April 12, 1999. When such records are first stored in computer readable format or when changes are made to any computer program that stores or accesses records, a registrar shall redact a person's social security number from a record before such record is made available to any person other than the holder of the number. The coordinator of elections shall also redact the social security number before making any voter registration records available to the public.

Nothing in subsection (a) shall be construed to prohibit an agency of a state, county, or municipal office from using a person's social security number for internal purposes or to prohibit a county election commission and its staff from using a person's social security number for enforcement of the election law as provided in this title, and nothing in subsection (a) shall be construed to limit the public's access to that record.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-227; Acts 1999, ch. 88, §§ 1, 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 6.

2-2-128. Forms — Retention in commission's office.

Permanent registration record forms and registration card forms may not be removed from the commission office except for the performance of duties under this title.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-228.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 6.

2-2-129. Transfer of registration — Procedure.

A voter may transfer registration when such voter moves outside the precinct in which such voter is registered as follows:

If a voter has moved within the same county, the voter may transfer the registration either in person, by mail, facsimile transmission or by e-mail with an attached document that includes a scanned signature. The voter may request a form which reads substantially as follows:

I, (Print name) , request that you change my address on permanent registration records, shown on the enclosed registration card as (Old Address) to (New Address) (Signature) Date .

Click to view form.

If a voter does not use the form, the voter shall include in the request for transfer all of the information required by this subdivision (a)(1);

If the voter moves outside the county, the voter may transfer by registering in the county of the voter's new residence; and

To provide an additional means of initiating and effecting transfers of voter registration within the county of current registration, the commission shall provide the officer of elections at each polling place and the officials at each early voting site with the proper affidavits. Voters who have moved within the county of registration may vote under the provisions described in § 2-7-140 and simultaneously transfer their registration. The written affidavit completed by the voter shall serve as a transfer of registration form for the voter. The election commission shall also make available transfer of address forms for voters who may anticipate a move in the future.

A county election commission may transfer registration when a voter moves outside the precinct in which such voter is registered as follows:

If the county election commission uses change of address information supplied by the postal service to identify registered voters whose addresses may have changed; and

If it appears from information provided by the postal service that:

A registered voter has moved to a different address of residence within the same county, the administrator may change the registration records to show the new address and send the registered voter a forwardable audit notice of the change using the new address and a postage prepaid pre-addressed return form by which the voter may verify or correct the address information; or

A registered voter has moved to an address of residence in a different county or moved without filing a change of address with the postal service, the administrator of elections may mail a forwardable confirmation notice to the registered voter pursuant to the procedures provided in § 2-2-106(c) and (d).

If the voter returns the form or otherwise notifies the election commission in writing and indicates the address information provided by the postal service is incorrect, the voter's registration shall be updated to reflect the correct address of residence.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1977, ch. 365, § 2; T.C.A., § 2-229; Acts 1994, ch. 919, §§ 21-25; 1997, ch. 550, § 4; 1999, ch. 499, § 1; 2009, ch. 218, § 1; 2012, ch. 1101, § 1.

Cross-References. Procedures for certain active voters, §2-7-141.

2-2-130. Transfer of registration — New registration card.

The administrator of elections, after transferring a registration, shall immediately give or mail to the voter a new registration card unless the transfer is accomplished through §2-7-140. If the registration is transferred as a result of §2-7-140, the administrator shall not provide the voter with a new registration card until after the completion of the election.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-230; Acts 1997, ch. 550, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

2-2-131. Replacement registration cards — Correction of errors in registration records.

If a voter states in writing that the voter has lost the registration card, the commission shall replace the registration card. A card issued to replace another shall be marked “Replacement Registration Card.” The permanent registration records shall show that the replacement was issued.

The commission may correct any errors in registration records which are apparent on the face of the records or which are called to its attention by the voter whose record is incorrect.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-231; Acts 1994, ch. 919, § 26.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 6.

2-2-132. Purging of permanent registration records.

The commission shall, not less than ninety (90) days before the regular August election, purge the permanent registration records of those persons whose registrations are required to be purged by §2-2-106.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-232; Acts 1983, ch. 450, § 2; 1984, ch. 878, § 1; 1990, ch. 628, § 2; 2003, ch. 307, § 5.

2-2-133. Report to coordinator of elections of deaths in state — Notification of county commissions — Information from social security administration death master file — Cancellation of registrations — Purge of records.

The state office of vital records of the department of health shall furnish the coordinator of elections a monthly, or more frequent, report, as required for compliance with the provisions of this section, of all persons eighteen (18) years of age or over who have died in the state. The report shall list the deaths by county with the names in alphabetical order. The report shall contain each decedent's full name, last address, date and place of birth, and social security number.

The coordinator of elections shall, after receipt of the report, notify each county election commission of all persons of voting age who died with an address in their county.

The coordinator of elections shall annually obtain information regarding Tennessee residents eighteen (18) years of age or over identified as deceased by the federal social security administration death master file. The coordinator of elections shall, after obtaining the information, notify each county election commission of all persons of voting age who are listed as deceased with an address in their county.

The county election commission shall cancel the registration of each deceased person listed under the reports in subsection (a) or (b), in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

In accordance with § 2-2-106(a)(3), each county election commission shall purge voting registration records of all deceased registered voters appearing on the report transmitted by the coordinator of elections at least every thirty (30) calendar days, and, beginning with the first day of any period of early voting, daily through the day of the election as such information is transmitted from the coordinator of elections.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1977, ch. 128, § 3; T.C.A., § 2-233; Acts 2006, ch. 578, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 965, § 4.

Amendments. The 2006 amendment by ch. 578 substituted “monthly, or more frequent, report, as required for compliance with the provisions of this section” for “monthly report” in (a)(1); and added (d).

The 2006 amendment by ch. 965 redesignated former (a) as (a)(1); redesignated former (b) as (a)(2); and added present (b) and (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2006, ch. 578, § 3. May 4, 2006.

Acts 2006, ch. 965, § 5. June 27, 2006.

Cross-References. Vital records, title 68, ch. 3.

2-2-134. Notice of cancellation attached to registration records — Cancelled registrations — Rejected ballots.

When an administrator of elections receives the notice provided by § 2-2-123, the administrator shall immediately attach the notice to the permanent registration records of the voter.

When a voter requests cancellation of registration, or the voter's registration is purged, the administrator shall cancel the registration by writing on the face of the permanent registration record of the voter

“Registration terminated this because

The cancellation shall be signed by the administrator.

The permanent registration records of the voter shall be placed in an alphabetically arranged file of purged registrations which shall be a public record. The file of purged registrations shall be retained by the county election commission for two (2) years from the date of the purge, after which time it may be destroyed by the county election commission.

Upon purging a registration record, the administrator shall determine whether the voter has an outstanding or uncounted absentee ballot. If the voter has an outstanding ballot, it shall be marked “Rejected” on receipt. If the voter has an uncounted ballot already submitted, the administrator shall provide the commission with the voter's name and ballot number, and the voter's ballot shall be rejected and so marked on election day.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1979, ch. 306, § 7; T.C.A., § 2-234; Acts 1980, ch. 609, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

2-2-135. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §2-2-135 (Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-235), concerning precinct registrars acting jointly, was repealed by Acts 1994, ch. 919, § 27.

2-2-136. Forms and supplies.

The coordinator of elections, at the expense of the state, shall provide the county election commissions with all forms necessary to carry out this chapter. The commissions shall be the custodians of the forms.

A county election commission may use a form generated by the county with the approval of the state coordinator of elections.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1975, ch. 183, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-236; Acts 1994, ch. 919, § 28.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

2-2-137. Alternative electronic or microfilm registration system.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter to the contrary, a county election commission may adopt a supplemental system for maintaining registration records utilizing electronic, electromechanical or microfilm equipment. If the election commission exercises its option to scan or microfilm the original permanent record, the filmed or scanned record shall be the legal document of registration. If the election commission microfilms or scans the registration document, the original hard copy shall be retained, but may be retained at any location designated by the election commission.

Beginning January 1, 2015, the coordinator of elections and the state election commission shall certify each voter registration system for purchase and use in the state. Subject to the concurrence of the state election commission, the coordinator of elections may make rules and policies as are necessary to carry out this subsection (b). In determining whether a voter registration system may be certified, the coordinator of elections and the state election commission shall consider, at a minimum, the following:

The compatibility of the voter registration system with any statewide system being operated by the secretary of state's office;

The history of ethical conduct in the sales of the voter registration system by the manufacturer or seller;

The ability of the manufacturer or seller of the voter registration system to provide adequate professional assistance and service to the counties of the state; and

The cyber security practices in place to protect the integrity of the voter registration process.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1976, ch. 464, § 1; 1977, ch. 231, § 1; 1977, ch. 410, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-237; Acts 1984, ch. 935, §§ 3, 6; 1994, ch. 919, §§ 29-31; 1997, ch. 558, § 30; 2008, ch. 928, §§ 4, 5; 2014, ch. 880, § 1; 2020, ch. 654, § 4.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment rewrote former (c), redesignated as present (b), which read: “The coordinator of elections in consultation with the state election commission shall determine whether a supplemental system meets the requirements of this section and whether such system is compatible with any statewide system being operated by the secretary of state's office. The coordinator of elections shall establish minimum requirements for certification that allow the county election commissions to perform the duties required by this title.”

The 2020 amendment added (b)(4).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 880, § 3. May 1, 2014.

Acts 2020, ch. 654, § 6. April 2, 2020.

2-2-138. Voter registration lists — Purchase by citizens.

In counties of this state having a population in excess of one hundred eighty thousand (180,000) according to the United States census of 1970 or any subsequent United States census, or in any computerized county, it is the duty of the county election commission to prepare or cause to be prepared each month a listing, by voting precinct, of all persons registered to vote in each precinct during the preceding month. However, in the discretion of the commissioners of the county election commission, such listing may be prepared on a bimonthly basis.

Such list, and any other voter registration information such as voter history, if compiled, shall be available for purchase for a price not to exceed the cost of production. This list shall be available to any person who certifies on a form provided by the state election commission that such list will be used for political purposes. The state election commission shall establish a uniform cost for this information. Any county election commission whose cost of production exceeds this rate may petition the state election commission and be granted an increase upon establishing its actual cost to the satisfaction of the state election commission. If the information is provided on computer generated media such as disk, diskette, tape, telecommunications or any other form of magnetic media, then the information shall be provided in non-proprietary and non-encrypted form. Minimum data standards shall be EBCDIC (Extended Binary Coded Decimal Interchange Code), ASCII (American Standard Code Information Interchange) or BCD (Binary Coded Decimal).

The list, and any other voter registration information, shall be the property of the county election commission and the state. Any vendor of the county election commission having access to the voter registration data shall only use such data to service the county election commission and shall be prohibited from using such data other than for purposes of assisting the county election commission and the coordinator of elections. Non-authorized use by the vendor of the data shall constitute a Class B misdemeanor and grounds for decertification by the state election commission.

The county election commission in counties with a population over two hundred fifty thousand (250,000) according to the 1980 census shall make voter registration lists available for purchase by any interested citizen, upon request and payment of the cost, at a price not in excess of the cost to prepare and publish such lists. The county election commission in counties with a population over two hundred fifty thousand (250,000) according to the 1980 census shall act upon such request within seven (7) days of receipt of the request, and reasons for rejection or modification of such request, if any, shall be set out in writing.

Any computerized county, as defined in § 2-1-104(a), shall make the list required by this section available on computer diskette to any person who certifies on a form provided by the state election commission that such list will be used for political purposes.

A false certification made pursuant to the provisions of this subsection (d) is a Class B misdemeanor, punishable only by a fine of five hundred dollars ($500).

Any list of registered voters compiled by the coordinator of elections shall be sold at a price established by the secretary of state. Any money received by the secretary of state from the sale of such lists shall be deposited in the voting machine loan fund established in § 2-9-114. This list shall be available for purchase to any person who certifies on a form provided by the state election commission that such list will be used for political purposes only.

Acts 1972, ch. 675, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-238; Acts 1981, ch. 478, § 7; 1993, ch. 379, § 2; 1994, ch. 919, § 32; 1995, ch. 196, § 1; 2000, ch. 756, § 3; 2002, ch. 694, § 1; 2008, ch. 928, § 6; 2014, ch. 880, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment added (b)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 880, § 3. May 1, 2014.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality, OAG 94-038 (3/21/94).

2-2-139. Restoration of suffrage to persons convicted of infamous crimes.

Any person who has forfeited the right of suffrage because of conviction of an infamous crime may register to vote and vote at any election for which the person is eligible by submitting sufficient proof to the administrator of elections in the county in which the person is seeking to register to vote, that:

The person has been pardoned of all infamous crimes and the person's full rights of citizenship, including the right of suffrage, have been restored;

The person's full rights of citizenship have been restored as prescribed by law; or

An appellate court of competent jurisdiction has entered a final judgment reversing the person's conviction, or convictions, of all infamous crimes.

For purposes of this section, a pardon or a certified copy of a judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction shall be sufficient proof to the administrator that the person fulfills the above requirements as to the offense or offenses specified on the pardon or judgment; however, before allowing a person convicted of an infamous crime to become a registered voter, it shall be the duty of the administrator in each county to verify with the state coordinator of elections that the person is eligible to register under the provisions of this section.

The state election coordinator is empowered to formulate a uniform procedure for verifying the registration eligibility of any person convicted of an infamous crime. Upon receiving sufficient verification of such person's eligibility to register, the administrator shall allow such person to become a registered voter in the same manner and in accordance with the same laws, rules, or regulations as any other citizen of this state.

The provisions of this section, relative to the forfeiture and restoration of the right of suffrage for those persons convicted of infamous crimes, shall also apply to those persons convicted of crimes prior to May 18, 1981, which are infamous crimes after May 18, 1981.

Acts 1981, ch. 345, §§ 3, 8.

Compiler's Notes. Portions of this section concerning retroactive disenfranchisement of convicted felons whose crimes were not infamous when convicted but were infamous after May 18, 1981, have been held unconstitutional. See Notes to Decisions, 1. Constitutionality. Gaskin v. Collins, 661 S.W.2d 865 (Tenn. 1983).

References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

Cross-References. Acts purging registration, §2-2-106.

Duties of election coordinator, §2-11-202.

Judgment of infamy, §40-20-112.

Notice of infamy, §40-20-113.

Qualified voters, §2-2-102.

Registration information, §2-2-116.

Suffrage for persons convicted of infamous crimes, §2-19-143.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Citizenship, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Revisiting Wesley v. Collins and Tennessee's Disenfranchisement Statute (Vanessa M. Cross), 36 U. Mem. L. Rev. 543 (2006).

Felon Disenfranchisement, 49 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1275 (Summer 2019).

2-2-140. Duplicate voter registrations.

The state coordinator of elections is encouraged to make every reasonable effort to enter into agreements with other states for the purpose of comparing data to identify duplicate voter registrations. If agreements are entered into with other states, upon finding any duplicate voter registrations, the state coordinator of elections shall make every effort to determine in which state the voter is rightfully entitled to vote.

The state coordinator of elections shall promulgate rules and regulations for any agreements entered into that make provisions for security, maintenance of the integrity of Tennessee's voter information and a method to determine, verify and resolve duplicate voter registrations between the states. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

The state coordinator of elections shall file a report with the state and local government committee of the senate and the state government committee of the house of representatives by January 15, 2009, and by January 15 in each year thereafter, regarding the status of any agreements entered into with other states, the progress or difficulties of reaching agreements with other states, and any other information the state coordinator of elections deems necessary to include in the report to keep the members of the general assembly apprised on this essential issue regarding the integrity of Tennessee's statewide voter registration database.

Acts 2008, ch. 895, § 1; 2013, ch. 236, § 65.